Washington statutes.
RCW 35.13.215

Annexation of fire districts—Transfer of employees.

(1) If any portion of a fire protection district is proposed for annexation to or incorporation into a city, code city, or town, both the fire protection district and the city, code city, or town shall jointly inform the employees of the fire protection district about hires, separations, terminations, and any other changes in employment that are a direct consequence of annexation or incorporations at the earliest reasonable opportunity.

(2) If any portion of a fire protection district is annexed to or incorporated into a city, code city or town, any employee of the fire protection district who (a) was at the time of such annexation or incorporation employed exclusively or principally in performing the powers, duties, and functions which are to be performed by the city, code city or town fire department (b) will, as a direct consequence of annexation or incorporation, be separated from the employ of the fire protection district, and (c) can perform the duties and meet the minimum requirements of the position to be filled, then such employee may transfer employment to the civil service system of the city, code city or town fire department as provided for in this section and RCW 35.13.225 and 35.13.235.

(3) For purposes of this section and RCW 35.13.225 and 35.13.235, employee means an individual whose employment with a fire protection district has been terminated because the fire protection district was annexed by a city, code city or town for purposes of fire protection.

[ 2009 c 60 s 4; 1986 c 254 s 7.]